Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-952
Retirement; disability; allowance; formula.

Upon retirement for disability, a member shall receive a disability retirement allowance which shall consist of a savings annuity and a service annuity computed in the manner specified in section 79-933 or, in lieu thereof, the formula annuity computed in the manner specified in section 79-934 without the reduction to the actuarial equivalent of the formula annuity deferred to the sixty-fifth birthday of the member.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 25, p. 646;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2925;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 458, p. 848;

Laws 1975, LB 50, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1524;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 587.